Utah statutes.
41-1a-712.   Foreign vehicle disclosure requirements -- Penalties -- Civil damages.

(1)  A person may not knowingly sell or offer for sale in this state any vehicle that was initially delivered for disposition or sale in a country other than the United States of America unless, prior to the sale, the person provides written notice to the purchaser on a separate form furnished by the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division:

(a)  that indicates:

(i)  that the vehicle was initially delivered for disposition or sale in a country outside of the United States as indicated on the Manufacturer's Statement of Origin or similar ownership document; and

(ii)  the country where the vehicle was initially delivered for the disposition or sale; and

(b)  that contains language substantially similar to each of the following statements:

(i)  "the odometer for this vehicle may have been converted to miles";

(ii)  "this vehicle meets U.S. Department of Transportation safety standards"; and

(iii)  "this vehicle may have manufacturer warranty exclusions if sold or offered for sale in this country."

(2)  A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

(3) (a)  In addition to any other penalties, a purchaser may bring a civil action to recover damages resulting from a seller's failure to provide notice as required under this section.

(b)  The amount of damages that may be recovered in a civil action are the actual damages or $1,500, whichever is greater.

